Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 17. Longwood University.

§ 23.1-1700.
Corporate name; name of the University.

The board of visitors of Longwood University (the board) is a corporation under the name and style of “The Visitors of Longwood University” and has, in addition to its other powers, all the corporate powers given to corporations by the provisions of Title 13.1 except those powers that are confined to corporations created pursuant to Title 13.1. The board shall at all times be under the control of the General Assembly.

The institution shall be known as Longwood University (the University).

History.

1964, c. 159, §§ 23-182, 23-183; 2002, cc. 158, 257; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1701.
Membership.

The board shall consist of 13 members appointed by the Governor, of whom at least two shall be alumni of the University and at least 11 shall be residents of the Commonwealth.

The alumni association of the University may submit to the Governor a list of at least three nominees for each vacancy on the board, whether the vacancy occurs by expiration of a term or otherwise. The Governor may appoint a member from the list of nominees.

History.

1964, c. 159, §§ 23-185, 23-186; 1973, c. 55; 1984, c. 772; 2002, cc. 158, 257; 2008, c. 399; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2008, c. 399, cl. 2, provides: “That the first additional board member shall be appointed for a three-year term to begin on July 1, 2008; the second additional board member shall be appointed for a four-year term to begin on July 1, 2009; and all successors to members so appointed shall be for terms of four years each.”

§ 23.1-1702.
Powers and duties.

The board shall appoint all teachers and agents and fix their salaries and generally direct the affairs of the University.

The board may confer degrees.

History.

1964, c. 159, §§ 23-188, 23-190; 2002, cc. 158, 257; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1703.
Program of instruction to educate and train teachers.

The University shall maintain a program of instruction to educate and train teachers for the public elementary and secondary schools of the Commonwealth without excluding other programs of instruction.

History.

1964, c. 159, § 23-191; 2002, cc. 158, 257; 2016, c. 588.